Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,162.07
Grant recipients; reports required.

The department shall require periodic reports to be filed by grant recipients to enable the department to review and follow up on actions taken by recipients to ensure that the purposes of the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act are achieved.

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 495, § 13.